pl: Typ załącznika folderu z lirą/z systemem przewracania stron: Z zaciskiem; Zacisk lirowy; Śruba lirowa; Magnetyczny; Taśma; Inne
sv: Fastsättningstyp för lyra/vändmapp: Clip-on; Lyrklämma; Lyrskruv; Magnetisk; Rem; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip fixare suport sub formă de liră/cu clemă pentru partituri: Clemă; Clemă suport tip liră; Șurub suport tip liră; Magnetic; Curea; Altele
fr: Type de pièce jointe au dossier Lyre/Flip: À pince; Pince lyre; Vis lyre; Magnétique; Avec sangle; Autre
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia pre notové lýry a flipové zakladače: Držiak clip-on; Lýrová svorka; Lýrová skrutka; Magnetický; S popruhmi; Iné
nl: Type lier-/draaimapbevestiging: Clip-on; Lierklem; Lierschroef; Magnetisch; Band; Andere
vi: Loại dụng cụ gập/lật giấy đính kèm: Dạng kẹp; Kẹp đàn lia; Vít đàn lia; Từ tính; Dây đai; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação de mola lira/viragem de página: Fecho de encaixe; Braçadeira de lira; Parafuso de lira; Magnético; Alça; Outro
nb: Vedleggstype for lyre/flip-mappe: Clip-on; Lyreklemme; Lyreskrue; Magnetisk; Stropp; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve za lire/preklopne mape: Priponka; Objemka za liro; Vijak za liro; Magnetno; S paščkom; Drugo
el: Τύπος προσάρτησης αναλογίου/τετραδίου αναλογίου: Κουμπωτό; Σφιγκτήρας λύρας; Βίδα λύρας; Μαγνητικό; Λουρί; Άλλο
de: Anbringungsart der Marschklemme/-mappe: Zum Anklipsen; Leierklammer; Schraube für Marschgabel; Magnetisch; Gurt; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип приставка за лира/папка за ноти: Clip-on; Скоба за лира; Винт за лира; Магнитна; Каишка; Други
hu: Kották és lapozható kottafüzetek rögzítéstípusai: Felcsíptethető; Kottarögzítő bilincs; Kottarögzítő csavar; Mágnes; Szíj; Egyéb
ko: 리라/플립 보면대 부착 유형: 클립식; 리어 클램프; 리어 스크루; 자기식; 스트랩; 기타
en: Lyre/Flip folder attachment type: Clip-on; Lyre clamp; Lyre screw; Magnetic; Strap; Other
fi: Lyyra-/selailukansion lisäosatyyppi: Klipsillinen; Lyyrapuristin; Lyyraruuvi; Magneettinen; Hihna; Muu
it: Tipo di accessorio per letturino/raccoglitore girevole: Chiusura a scatto; Pinza per lira; Vite lira; Magnetico; Cinghia; Altro
da: Lyre/Flip-mappetype: Clip-on; Lyreklemme; Lyreskrue; Magnetisk; Strop; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta stalka/lire za note: Na kopčanje; Stezaljka za držač nota; Vijak za liru; Magnetno; Na zatezanje; Ostalo
th: ประเภทที่หนีบ/แฟ้มโน้ตดนตรี: แบบหนีบ; ที่หนีบระบบ Lyre; ที่จับแบบสกรูระบบ Lyre; แม่เหล็ก; สายรัด; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ upevnění držáku na noty: Klip; Svorka na lyru; Šroub na lyru; Magnetická; Popruhy; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de anexação da pasta par partitura: Clip-on; Braçadeira de lira; Parafuso de lira; Magnética; Cinta; Outro
zh-CN: Lyre/Flip 文件夹附件类型: 夹式; 琴夹; 琴弦螺丝; 磁力; 条带; 其他
tr: Lir/Flip klasörü ek türü: Klipsli; Lir kelepçesi; Lir vidası; Manyetik; Kayış; Diğer
ja: ライアー/譜面フォルダーのアタッチメントの種類: クリップ式; ライヤークランプ; ライヤースクリュー; 磁気; ストラップ; その他
zh-TW: 里拉琴/翻蓋資料夾附件類型: 夾式; 夾式支架; 支架螺絲; 磁性; 綁帶; 其他
ru: Тип крепления нотодержателя: Зажим; Лирообразный зажим; Лирообразный винт; Магнитный; С ремешками; Другое
es: Tipo de montate para carpeta o abrazadera para partitura: Con clip; Abrazadera Lyre; Tornillo Lyre; Magnético; Correa; Otros
lt-LT: Muzikos natų aplanko / laikiklio priedo tipas: Prisegamas; Lyros spaustukas; Lyros sriegis; Magnetinis; Užsegama; Kita